Illinois, session 104th, HB5389.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)7    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 8including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 9of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 10coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 11benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 12health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 13under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 14356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 15356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 16356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 17356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 18356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 19356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 20356z.74, 356z.77, 356z.80, and 356z.88 of the Illinois 21Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with Sections 22155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance 23Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the   HB5389- 2 -LRB104 15434 BAB 28589 b1requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 2benefits be covered as provided in this Section is an 3exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial and 4limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the 5Illinois Constitution. A home rule county to which this 6Section applies must comply with every provision of this 7Section. 8    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 9any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 10with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 11Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 12Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 13whatever reason, is unauthorized. 14(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 15102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 161-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 17eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 18102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 191-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 20eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 21103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 227-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 23eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 24revised 11-26-24.) 25    Section 10. The Township Code is amended by changing   HB5389- 3 -LRB104 15434 BAB 28589 b1Section 100-15 as follows: 2    (60 ILCS 1/100-15)3    Sec. 100-15. Group insurance. In addition to any powers 4that it may exercise under the Government Salary Withholding 5Act, the township board may provide, for the benefit of the 6township's employees, officials, or retired officials and 7their dependents, group life, health, accident, hospital, or 8dental insurance or any combination of those types of 9insurance. The insurance may include provision for employees, 10officials, retired officials, and their dependents who rely on 11treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone for healing in 12accordance with the tenets and practice of a well recognized 13religious denomination. The township board may provide for 14payment by the township of all or a portion of the premium or 15charge for the insurance for covered persons, except that the 16township may not pay all or a portion of the premium or charge 17for the insurance for retired officials and their dependents. 18If the township board undertakes a plan under which the 19township does not pay the entire amount of premiums or charges 20for the insurance, the board may provide for withholding and 21deducting from the compensation of its employees or officers 22amounts required to pay the balance of the premiums or 23charges. If the township board provides accident and health 24insurance coverage under this Section, then the coverage shall 25comply with the requirements of Section 356z.88 of the   HB5389- 4 -LRB104 15434 BAB 28589 b1Illinois Insurance Code. 2(Source: P.A. 88-62; 89-326, eff. 1-1-96.) 3    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 4changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 5    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)6    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 7municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 8self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 9coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 10coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 11covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 12Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 13356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 14356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 15356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 16356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 17356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 18356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 19356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 20356z.80, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 22and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 23Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 24requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in   HB5389- 5 -LRB104 15434 BAB 28589 b1this is an exclusive power and function of the State and is a 2denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection 3(h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule municipality to 4which this Section applies must comply with every provision of 5this Section. 6    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 7any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 8with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 9Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 10Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 11whatever reason, is unauthorized. 12(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 13102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 141-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 15eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 16102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 171-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 18eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 207-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 21eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 22revised 11-26-24.) 23    Section 20. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 24adding Section 356z.88 as follows:   HB5389- 6 -LRB104 15434 BAB 28589 b1    (215 ILCS 5/356z.88 new)2    Sec. 356z.88. Annual lung cancer screenings for 3firefighters. No policy of accident and health insurance shall 4be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this State on or 5after January 1, 2027 unless the policy provides coverage for 6annual lung cancer screenings for any beneficiary currently 7employed as an active firefighter or any person eligible for 8or currently receiving a retirement annuity, retirement 9pension, disability pension, or disability benefit pursuant to 10Article 4 or Article 6 of the Illinois Pension Code. This 11coverage shall be provided without cost sharing.  12    Section 25. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 13changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 14    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)15    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 16assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 17benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 18health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 19under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 20356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 21356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 22and 356z.67, and 356z.71, 356z.75, 356z.80, and 356z.88 of the 23Illinois Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of 24Sections 356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1   HB5389- 7 -LRB104 15434 BAB 28589 b1of the Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 2provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network 3Adequacy and Transparency Act.4    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 5the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 6Code. 7    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 8rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 9any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 10of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 11with Section 5-5e. 12    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 13Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 14ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 15post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 16no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 191-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 20eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 21102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 221-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 23eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 24revised 11-26-24.)